Hawaii statutes.
§806-49 Arraignment; plea of not guilty.
If any person being arraigned upon any indictment for any offense pleads
thereto a plea of "not guilty", the person shall by that plea without
any further form, be deemed to have put oneself upon the country for trial, and
the court shall in the usual manner order a jury for the trial of the person
accordingly. [L 1876, c 40, §36; RL 1925, §4070; RL 1935, §5519; RL 1945,
§10822; RL 1955, §258-32; HRS §711-49; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Arraignment in circuit court, see HRPP rule 10.

Pleas, see HRPP rule 11.

Case Notes

Plea cures defect in indictment for purpose of trying issue.
5 H. 621 (1886).

Plea of guilty entered before court having jurisdiction of
the offense cannot be retracted in appellate court. 8 H. 273 (1891).

Application to withdraw plea of "guilty" and enter "not
guilty" is within sound discretion of court. 20 H. 103 (1910); 23 H. 636,
638 (1917).

Plea raises issue of sanity. 37 H. 463 (1947).

Defendant who alleges that defendant pleaded guilty because
of a prior coerced confession is not, without more, entitled to hearing on
petition for habeas corpus. 53 H. 274, 492 P.2d 953 (1972).

It is within discretion of trial court to permit withdrawal
of a guilty plea. 57 H. 46, 549 P.2d 727 (1976).

Defendant does not have an absolute right to withdraw
defendant's guilty plea. 58 H. 574, 574 P.2d 521 (1978).

Requirements of acceptance of guilty plea. 59 H. 592, 585
P.2d 1259 (1978).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next